Colorado statutes. TITLE 44 Revenue - Regulation of Activities
PART 4
CLASSES OF LICENSES AND PERMITS

44-3-401. Classes of licenses and permits - rules.

For the purpose of regulating the manufacture, sale, and distribution of alcohol beverages, the state licensing authority in its discretion, upon application in the prescribed form made to it, may issue and grant to the applicant a license or permit from any of the following classes, subject to the provisions and restrictions provided by this article 3:

Manufacturer's license;

Limited winery license;

Nonresident manufacturer's license;

Importer's license;

Malt liquor importer's license;

Wholesaler's liquor license;

Wholesaler's beer license;

Retail liquor store license;

Liquor-licensed drugstore license;

Beer and wine license;

Hotel and restaurant license;

Tavern license;

Brew pub license;

Club license;

Arts license;

Racetrack license;

Public transportation system license;

Optional premises license;

Retail gaming tavern license;

Vintner's restaurant license;

Wine packaging permit;

Distillery pub license;

Lodging and entertainment license;

Manager's permit.

If the federal alcohol and tobacco tax and trade bureau approves the purchase, sale, possession, or manufacturing of powdered alcohol in the United States, the state licensing authority shall adopt rules establishing a mechanism for regulating the manufacture, purchase, sale, possession, and use of powdered alcohol.

Source:

L. 2018:

Entire article added with relocations, (HB 18-1025), ch. 152, p. 988, § 2, effective October 1.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 12-47-401 as it existed prior to 2018.

44-3-402. Manufacturer's license.

A manufacturer's license shall be issued by the state licensing authority to persons distilling, rectifying, or brewing within this state for the following purposes only:

To produce, manufacture, or rectify malt, vinous, or spirituous liquors;

To sell malt or vinous liquors of their own manufacture within this state. Brewers or winers licensed under this section may solicit business directly from licensed retail persons or consumers by procuring a wholesaler's license as provided in this article 3; except that any malt liquor sold at wholesale by a brewer that has procured a wholesaler's license shall be unloaded and placed in the physical possession of a licensed wholesaler at the wholesaler's licensed premises in this state and inventoried for purposes of tax collection prior to delivery to a retailer or consumer. Wholesalers of malt liquors receiving products to be held as required by this subsection (1)(b) shall be liable for the payment of any tax due on such products under section 44-3-503 (1)(a).

To sell vinous or spirituous liquors of their own manufacture within the state to persons licensed by this article 3 without procuring a wholesaler's license;

To sell malt, vinous, or spirituous liquors in other states, the laws of which permit the sale of alcohol beverages;

To sell for export to foreign countries, if such export for beverage or medicinal purposes is permitted by the laws of the United States; but Colorado distillers, rectifiers, winers, and brewers licensed under this section may sell their products distilled, rectified, or brewed in this state directly to licensed retail licensees by procuring a wholesaler's license.

A winery licensed pursuant to this section may conduct tastings and sell vinous liquors of its own manufacture, as well as other vinous liquors manufactured by other Colorado wineries licensed pursuant to this section or section 44-3-403, on the licensed premises of the winery and at one other approved sales room location at no additional cost, whether included in the license at the time of the original license issuance or by supplemental application. If the licensed premises includes multiple noncontiguous locations, the winery may operate a sales room on only one of those noncontiguous locations. Any additional sales room operated on a noncontiguous location of the licensed premises must be approved in accordance with the process outlined in subsection (2)(c) of this section.

A winery licensed pursuant to this section may serve and sell food, general merchandise, and nonalcohol beverages for consumer consumption on or off the licensed premises.

Prior to operating a sales room location, a winery licensed pursuant to this section shall, at the time of application to the state licensing authority, send a copy of the application or supplemental application for a sales room to the local licensing authority in the jurisdiction in which the sales room is proposed. The local licensing authority may submit a response to the application, including its determination specified in subsection (2)(c)(II) of this section, to the state licensing authority but must submit its response within forty-five days after the licensed winery submits its sales room application to the state licensing authority, or, for purposes of an application to operate a temporary sales room for not more than three consecutive days, within the time specified by the state licensing authority by rule.
(c) (I) (A) Prior to operating a sales room location, a winery licensed pursuant to this section shall, at the time of application to the state licensing authority, send a copy of the application or supplemental application for a sales room to the local licensing authority in the jurisdiction in which the sales room is proposed. The local licensing authority may submit a response to the application, including its determination specified in subsection (2)(c)(II) of this section, to the state licensing authority but must submit its response within forty-five days after the licensed winery submits its sales room application to the state licensing authority, or, for purposes of an application to operate a temporary sales room for not more than three consecutive days, within the time specified by the state licensing authority by rule.

If the local licensing authority does not submit a response to the state licensing authority within the time specified in subsection (2)(c)(I)(A) of this section, the state licensing authority shall deem that the local licensing authority has determined that the proposed sales room will not impact traffic, noise, or other neighborhood concerns in a manner that is inconsistent with local regulations or ordinances or that the applicant will sufficiently mitigate any impacts identified by the local licensing authority.

The state licensing authority must consider the response from the local licensing authority, if any, and may deny the proposed sales room application if the local licensing authority determines that approval of the proposed sales room will impact traffic, noise, or other neighborhood concerns in a manner that is inconsistent with local regulations or ordinances, which may be determined by the local licensing authority without requiring a public hearing, or that the applicant cannot sufficiently mitigate any potential impacts identified by the local licensing authority.

The state licensing authority shall not grant approval of an additional sales room unless the applicant affirms to the state licensing authority that the applicant has complied with local zoning restrictions.

A licensed winery that is operating a sales room as of August 5, 2015, or that is granted approval pursuant to this subsection (2)(c) to operate a sales room on or after August 5, 2015, shall notify the state licensing authority of all sales rooms it operates. The state licensing authority shall maintain a list of all licensed winery sales rooms in the state and make the list available on its website.

The local licensing authority may request that the state licensing authority take action in accordance with section 44-3-601 against a licensed winery approved to operate a sales room if the local licensing authority:

Demonstrates to the state licensing authority that the licensee has engaged in an unlawful act as set forth in part 9 of this article 3; or

Shows good cause as specified in section 44-3-103 (19)(a), (19)(b), or (19)(d).

This subsection (2)(c) does not apply if the licensed winery does not sell and serve vinous liquors for consumption on the licensed premises or in an approved sales room.

Any winery that has received a license pursuant to this section shall be authorized to manufacture vinous liquors upon an alternating proprietor licensed premises, as approved by the state licensing authority, but retail sales of vinous liquors shall not be conducted from an area licensed or defined as an alternating proprietor licensed premises.

Any brewery that has received a license pursuant to this section shall be authorized to manufacture malt liquors upon an alternating proprietor licensed premises, as approved by the state licensing authority, but retail sales of malt liquors shall not be conducted from an area licensed or defined as an alternating proprietor licensed premises.

Any winery or brewery that holds a wholesaler's license pursuant to section 44-3-407 may engage in the wholesale sale of alcohol beverages that the licensee manufactured at an alternating proprietor licensed premises from both its licensed premises and the alternating proprietor licensed premises where the alcohol beverages were manufactured.

A winery that has received a license pursuant to this section may ship wine directly to personal consumers if the winery also has received a winery direct shipper's permit under section 44-3-104.

It is unlawful for a manufacturer licensed under this article 3 or any person, partnership, association, organization, or corporation interested financially in or with a licensed manufacturer to be interested financially, directly or indirectly, in the business of any person licensed to sell at retail pursuant to this article 3 or article 4 of this title 44.

It is unlawful for any licensed manufacturer of vinous or spirituous liquors or any person, partnership, association, organization, or corporation interested financially in or with such a licensed manufacturer to be interested financially, directly or indirectly, in the business of any vinous or spirituous wholesale licensee; except that any such financial interest that occurred on or before July 1, 1969, shall be lawful.

Each applicant for a license as a brewer shall enter into a written contract with each wholesaler with which the applicant intends to do business that designates the territory within which the product of the applicant is sold by the respective wholesaler. The contract shall be submitted to the state licensing authority with an application, and the applicant, if licensed, shall have a continuing duty to submit any subsequent revisions, amendments, or superseding contracts to the state licensing authority.

A manufacturer of spirituous liquors licensed pursuant to this section may conduct tastings and sell to customers spirituous liquors of its own manufacture on its licensed premises and at one other approved sales room location at no additional cost. A sales room location may be included in the license at the time of the original license issuance or by supplemental application.

A manufacturer of spirituous liquors licensed pursuant to this section may serve and sell food, general merchandise, and nonalcohol beverages for consumer consumption on or off the licensed premises.

Prior to operating a sales room location, a manufacturer of spirituous liquors licensed pursuant to this section shall, at the time of application to the state licensing authority, send a copy of the application or supplemental application for a sales room to the local licensing authority in the jurisdiction in which the sales room is proposed. The local licensing authority may submit a response to the application, including its determination specified in subsection (7)(c)(II) of this section, to the state licensing authority but must submit its response within forty-five days after the licensee submits its sales room application to the state licensing authority, or, for purposes of an application to operate a temporary sales room for not more than three consecutive days, within the time specified by the state licensing authority by rule.
(c) (I) (A) Prior to operating a sales room location, a manufacturer of spirituous liquors licensed pursuant to this section shall, at the time of application to the state licensing authority, send a copy of the application or supplemental application for a sales room to the local licensing authority in the jurisdiction in which the sales room is proposed. The local licensing authority may submit a response to the application, including its determination specified in subsection (7)(c)(II) of this section, to the state licensing authority but must submit its response within forty-five days after the licensee submits its sales room application to the state licensing authority, or, for purposes of an application to operate a temporary sales room for not more than three consecutive days, within the time specified by the state licensing authority by rule.

If the local licensing authority does not submit a response to the state licensing authority within the time specified in subsection (7)(c)(I)(A) of this section, the state licensing authority shall deem that the local licensing authority has determined that the proposed sales room will not impact traffic, noise, or other neighborhood concerns in a manner that is inconsistent with local regulations or ordinances or that the applicant will sufficiently mitigate any impacts identified by the local licensing authority.

The state licensing authority must consider the response from the local licensing authority, if any, and may deny the proposed sales room application if the local licensing authority determines that approval of the proposed sales room will impact traffic, noise, or other neighborhood concerns in a manner that is inconsistent with local regulations or ordinances, which may be determined by the local licensing authority without requiring a public hearing, or that the applicant cannot sufficiently mitigate any potential impacts identified by the local licensing authority.

The state licensing authority shall not grant approval of an additional sales room unless the applicant affirms to the state licensing authority that the applicant has complied with local zoning restrictions.

A licensed spirituous liquors manufacturer that is operating a sales room as of August 5, 2015, or that is granted approval pursuant to this subsection (7)(c) to operate a sales room on or after August 5, 2015, shall notify the state licensing authority of all sales rooms it operates. The state licensing authority shall maintain a list of all licensed spirituous liquor manufacturer sales rooms in the state and make the list available on its website.

The local licensing authority may request that the state licensing authority take action in accordance with section 44-3-601 against a licensed spirituous liquors manufacturer approved to operate a sales room if the local licensing authority:

Demonstrates to the state licensing authority that the licensee has engaged in an unlawful act as set forth in part 9 of this article 3; or

Shows good cause as specified in section 44-3-103 (19)(a), (19)(b), or (19)(d).

This subsection (7)(c) does not apply if the licensed spirituous liquors manufacturer does not sell and serve its spirituous liquors for consumption on the licensed premises or in an approved sales room.

Source:

L. 2018:

Entire article added with relocations, (HB 18-1025), ch. 152, p. 990, § 2, effective October 1.

L. 2019:

(3)(c) and (5)(a) amended, (SB 19-011), ch. 1, p. 7, § 8, effective January 31.

L. 2021:

(2)(a) amended, (HB 21-1044), ch. 165, p. 927, § 3, effective September 7.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 12-47-402 as it existed prior to 2018.

44-3-403. Limited winery license - rules.

A Colorado limited winery license shall be granted by the state licensing authority to an applicant that certifies that it will manufacture not more than one hundred thousand gallons, or the metric equivalent thereof, of vinous liquors within Colorado. Each limited winery licensee shall annually certify to the state licensing authority its compliance with this subsection (1) and shall be subject to revocation of its license for false certification.

A limited winery licensee is authorized:

To manufacture vinous liquors upon its licensed premises and, in order to enhance the growth and viability of the Colorado wine industry, upon alternating proprietor licensed premises, as approved by the state licensing authority;

To sell vinous liquors of its own manufacture within this state at wholesale, at retail, or to personal consumers, including, if the limited winery also has received a winery direct shipper's permit under section 44-3-104, sales to be delivered by common carrier or by the limited winery licensee to personal consumers in accordance with all requirements in section 44-3-104;

To sell vinous liquors of its own manufacture in other states, the laws of which permit the sale of such wines and liquors;

To sell vinous liquors of its own manufacture for export to foreign countries if such export is permitted by the laws of the United States;

Except as provided in subsection (2)(e)(I)(B) of this section and subject to subsection (2)(e)(II) of this section, to conduct tastings and sell vinous liquors of its own manufacture, as well as vinous liquors manufactured by other Colorado wineries, on the licensed premises of the limited winery and up to five other approved sales room locations, whether included in the license at the time of the original license issuance or by supplemental application. If the licensed premises includes multiple noncontiguous locations, the licensee may operate a sales room on only one of those noncontiguous locations. Any additional sales room operated on a noncontiguous location of the licensed premises must be approved as one of the licensee's additional sales rooms allowed under this subsection (2)(e)(I)(A) in accordance with the process outlined in subsection (2)(e)(II) of this section.
(e) (I) (A) Except as provided in subsection (2)(e)(I)(B) of this section and subject to subsection (2)(e)(II) of this section, to conduct tastings and sell vinous liquors of its own manufacture, as well as vinous liquors manufactured by other Colorado wineries, on the licensed premises of the limited winery and up to five other approved sales room locations, whether included in the license at the time of the original license issuance or by supplemental application. If the licensed premises includes multiple noncontiguous locations, the licensee may operate a sales room on only one of those noncontiguous locations. Any additional sales room operated on a noncontiguous location of the licensed premises must be approved as one of the licensee's additional sales rooms allowed under this subsection (2)(e)(I)(A) in accordance with the process outlined in subsection (2)(e)(II) of this section.

A limited winery licensee shall not conduct retail sales from an area licensed or defined as an alternating proprietor licensed premises.

Prior to operating a sales room location, a limited winery licensed pursuant to this section shall, at the time of application to the state licensing authority, send a copy of the application or supplemental application for a sales room to the local licensing authority in the jurisdiction in which the sales room is proposed. The local licensing authority may submit a response to the application, including its determination specified in subsection (2)(e)(II)(B) of this section, to the state licensing authority but must submit its response within forty-five days after the licensed limited winery submits its sales room application to the state licensing authority, or, for purposes of an application to operate a temporary sales room for not more than three consecutive days, within the time specified by the state licensing authority by rule. If the local licensing authority does not submit a response to the state licensing authority within the time specified in this subsection (2)(e)(II)(A), the state licensing authority shall deem that the local licensing authority has determined that the proposed sales room will not impact traffic, noise, or other neighborhood concerns in a manner that is inconsistent with local regulations or ordinances or that the applicant will sufficiently mitigate any impacts identified by the local licensing authority.

The state licensing authority must consider the response from the local licensing authority, if any, and may deny the proposed sales room application if the local licensing authority determines that approval of the proposed sales room will impact traffic, noise, or other neighborhood concerns in a manner that is inconsistent with local regulations or ordinances, which may be determined by the local licensing authority without requiring a public hearing, or that the applicant cannot sufficiently mitigate any potential impacts identified by the local licensing authority.

The state licensing authority shall not grant approval of an additional sales room unless the applicant affirms to the state licensing authority that the limited winery applicant has complied with local zoning restrictions.

A licensed limited winery that is operating a sales room as of August 5, 2015, or that is granted approval pursuant to this subsection (2)(e)(II) to operate a sales room on or after August 5, 2015, shall notify the state licensing authority of all sales rooms it operates. The state licensing authority shall maintain a list of all limited winery licensee sales rooms in the state and make the list available on its website.

The local licensing authority may request that the state licensing authority take action in accordance with section 44-3-601 against a licensed limited winery approved to operate a sales room if the local licensing authority demonstrates to the state licensing authority that the licensee has engaged in an unlawful act as set forth in part 9 of this article 3 or shows good cause as specified in section 44-3-103 (19)(a), (19)(b), or (19)(d).

This subsection (2)(e)(II) does not apply if the licensed limited winery does not sell and serve vinous liquors for consumption on the licensed premises or in an approved sales room.

To serve and sell food, general merchandise, and nonalcohol beverages for consumption on the premises of any licensed premises or to be taken by the consumer.

In order to encourage and maintain the integrity and authenticity of Colorado's viticultural identity, support the wine-grape and fruit growing industries in Colorado, and inform the consumer of the source of grapes and fruit used by Colorado limited wineries to produce vinous liquors, the liquor enforcement division shall, after consultation with the Colorado wine industry and other interested parties from the alcohol beverage industry, within one year after June 1, 2005, enact rules for the implementation, standardization, and enforcement of appellation labeling requirements that are consistent with, and, with respect to the origin of the grapes and other fruit used to manufacture the vinous liquor, more informative than currently required by federal wine labeling regulations set forth in 27 CFR 4, "Labeling and Advertising of Wine", and related regulations. Colorado's labeling regulations shall apply to a manufacturer licensed pursuant to section 44-3-402 or a Colorado limited winery licensed under this section in the manufacture of the vinous liquor contained in the labeled bottle. Honey wine, including honey wine flavored with fruit, herbs, or spices, shall be exempt from the labeling requirements included in this section.

A winery may affix the phrase "Colorado Grown" to bottles of wine described in section 44-3-103 (10).

Effective July 1, 2006, it shall be unlawful for a Colorado winery to make any misleading statement on its product label regarding the origin of grapes, fruit, or other agricultural products used to make vinous liquor. This subsection (4)(b) shall not be construed to apply to the winery's name or address or to an appellation allowed under federal regulations.

A person who has a financial interest in a limited winery license and relinquishes such license to apply for another license under this article 3 shall be prohibited from obtaining a limited winery license for three years from the date of issuance of such other license.

It is unlawful for any limited winery licensee or any person, partnership, association, organization, or corporation interested financially in or with a limited winery licensee to be interested financially, directly or indirectly, in the business of any person licensed to sell at retail pursuant to this article 3.

It is unlawful for any limited winery licensee or any person, partnership, association, organization, or corporation interested financially in or with a limited winery licensee to be interested financially, directly or indirectly, in the business of any vinous or spirituous wholesale licensee.

Source:

L. 2018:

Entire article added with relocations, (HB 18-1025), ch. 152, p. 994, § 2, effective October 1.

L. 2019:

(2)(e)(I)(A) amended, (SB 19-241), ch. 390, p. 3479, § 62, effective August 2.

L. 2021:

(2)(e)(I)(A) amended, (HB 21-1044), ch. 165, p. 927, § 4, effective September 7.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 12-47-403 as it existed prior to 2018.

44-3-404. Festival permit - rules.

A person listed in subsection (9) of this section may file a festival permit application with the state licensing authority. The applicant must:

Specify the licensed premises for the first of the festivals to be held;

File the application at least ten business days before the festival is to be held; and

Include a twenty-five dollar annual processing fee with the application filed with the state licensing authority.

A local licensing authority may create a local permit for festivals; except that a limited winery licensee or winery licensee need not obtain a local permit to participate in or hold a festival. If a local licensing authority does not create a local permit under this subsection (1)(b), an applicant need not obtain a local permit under this subsection (1)(b) to conduct festivals.

If a licensee is applying for both a festival permit and a special event liquor permit issued under article 5 of this title 44, the licensee need not apply for any local permit established in accordance with subsection (1)(b)(I) of this section.

If a festival permittee notifies the state licensing authority and the appropriate local licensing authority of the location of and dates of each festival at least ten business days before holding the festival, the permittee may hold up to, but no more than, nine festivals during the twelve months after the festival permit is issued.

The licensee that holds the festival must file the application for the permit, but other licensees may jointly participate under the permit issued to the licensee that applied for the permit.

Notification of all subsequent festivals shall be by supplemental application, as approved by the state licensing authority.

The state licensing authority may deny a festival permit or supplemental application for any of the following reasons:

A documented history of violations of this article 3 or rules issued under this article 3 by any participating licensee;

The filing of an incomplete or late application; or

A finding that the application, if granted, would result in violations of this article 3 or rules issued under this article 3 or violations of the laws of a local government.

After the issuance of an initial festival permit, all supplemental applications that are complete and filed in a timely manner are deemed approved unless the state licensing authority provides the permittee with a notice of denial at least seventy-two hours prior to the date of the event.

Notwithstanding any other provision of this article 3, the permittee and participating licensees are authorized to use the licensed premises jointly to conduct alcohol beverage tastings and to engage in the same retail sales of alcohol beverages that the permittee and participating licensees are authorized to conduct at their licensed premises. A festival permit does not authorize the permittee to use the licensed premises for more than seventy-two hours for any one festival.

If a violation of this article 3 occurs during a festival and the licensee responsible for the violation can be identified, the state or local licensing authority may charge and impose appropriate penalties on the licensee. If the responsible party cannot be identified, the state licensing authority may send a written notice to every licensee identified on the permit application and may fine each the same dollar amount, which fine must not exceed twenty-five dollars per licensee or two hundred dollars in the aggregate. A joint fine levied pursuant to this subsection (7) does not apply to the revocation of the licensee's license under section 44-3-601.

A joint fine levied pursuant to subsection (7) of this section shall not create or increase civil liability under section 44-3-801 (3) for a participating licensee or create joint liability for such a licensee.

This section applies to a person licensed under section 44-3-402, 44-3-403, 44-3-407, 44-3-411, 44-3-413, 44-3-414, 44-3-417, 44-3-422, or 44-3-426.

The state licensing authority may adopt rules necessary to implement and administer this section.

Source:

L. 2018:

Entire article added with relocations, (HB 18-1025), ch. 152, p. 996, § 2, effective October 1.

L. 2021:

(1), (2), IP(4), (5), (6), and (7) amended and (9) and (10) added, (SB 21-082), ch. 195, p. 1044, § 2, effective September 7.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 12-47-403.5 as it existed prior to 2018.

44-3-405. Importer's license.

An importer's license shall be issued to persons importing vinous or spirituous liquors into this state for the following purposes only:

To import and sell such liquors to wholesale liquor licensees;

To solicit orders from retail licensees and fill such orders through wholesale liquor licensees.

Such license shall not permit the licensee to maintain stocks of alcohol beverages in this state.

It is unlawful for any licensed importer of vinous or spirituous liquors or any person, partnership, association, organization, or corporation interested financially in or with such a licensed importer to be interested financially, directly or indirectly, in the business of any vinous or spirituous wholesale licensee; except that any such financial interest that occurred on or before July 1, 1969, shall be lawful.

Source:

L. 2018:

Entire article added with relocations, (HB 18-1025), ch. 152, p. 997, § 2, effective October 1.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 12-47-404 as it existed prior to 2018.

44-3-406. Nonresident manufacturers and importers of malt liquor.

A nonresident manufacturer's license shall be issued to persons brewing malt liquor outside the state of Colorado for the purposes listed in subsection (3) of this section.

A malt liquor importer's license shall be issued to persons importing malt liquor into this state for the purposes listed in subsection (3) of this section.

The licenses referred to in subsections (1) and (2) of this section shall be issued for the following purposes only:

To import and sell malt liquors within the state of Colorado to persons licensed as wholesalers pursuant to this article 3;

To maintain stocks of malt liquors and to operate malt liquor warehouses by procuring a malt liquor wholesaler's license for each such operation as provided in this article 3;

To solicit orders from retail licensees licensed under this article 3 or article 4 of this title 44 and fill the orders through malt liquor wholesalers.

Any person holding a nonresident manufacturer's license or a malt liquor importer's license shall also be eligible to obtain a vinous and spirituous liquor importer's license pursuant to section 44-3-405; except that each such license obtained shall be separate and distinct.

Each manufacturer, nonresident manufacturer, and malt liquor importer shall enter into a written contract with each wholesaler with which the manufacturer, nonresident manufacturer, and malt liquor importer intends to do business that designates the territory within which the product of the manufacturer, nonresident manufacturer, and malt liquor importer is sold by the respective wholesaler. A manufacturer, nonresident manufacturer, and malt liquor importer shall not contract with more than one wholesaler to sell their products within the same territory. The contract shall be submitted to the state licensing authority with any application and the applicant, if licensed, shall have a continuing duty to submit any subsequent revisions, amendments, or superseding contracts to the state licensing authority.

It is unlawful for a nonresident manufacturer licensed under this article 3, or any person, partnership, association, organization, or corporation interested financially in or with the licensee, to be interested financially, directly or indirectly, in the business of any person licensed to sell at retail pursuant to this article 3 or article 4 of this title 44.

Source:

L. 2018:

Entire article added with relocations, (HB 18-1025), ch. 152, p. 998, § 2, effective October 1.

L. 2019:

(3)(c) and (6) amended, (SB 19-011), ch. 1, p. 7, § 9, effective January 31.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 12-47-405 as it existed prior to 2018.